2018-komp-ling/practicals/Practical2/HFST/sec_att.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<s%>                ! Имя существительное

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: #;

LEXICON Nouns

specific:specific N  ;     ! "улица"
Subtracting:Subtracting N ;   ! "сад"
Using:Using N ;     ! "город"
sequential:sequential N ;   ! "совет"
